Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 6.1 Inspection and Control of Cattle Produced Milk

4-6.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the director of health of the state and also his or her agents and servants authorized by law or by lawful direction of the director to perform any act or to do any thing under the terms of any particular provision of this title or chapter 2 of title 21 with respect to powers, duties or obligations specifically imposed upon the director.

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, trust or trustee, partnership, or association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

4-6.1-2.
Director to enforce permit requirements for producers.

The director has power, authority, and responsibility, in addition to those possessed under the provisions of chapter 2 of title 21 to enforce all requirements of that chapter that producers have permits issued by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3.

4-6.1-3.
Director to keep information concerning producers.

The director shall keep a file of the names and addresses and of any additional information as he or she may require, as to all of those holding producer’s permits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3.

4-6.1-4.
Coloring of milk not meeting standards.

The director has authority in case of a discovery of violation of the provisions of chapters 4 — 7 of this title, specially to treat so as to prominently identify, by the use of vegetable coloring matter, any and all milk found by him or her produced under conditions constituting a violation or violations of the provisions of chapters 4 — 7 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3.

4-6.1-5.
Dairy farms to be open to inspection.

All dairy farms of any permittee are open to inspection by the director and his or her authorized agents at all reasonable times.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3.

4-6.1-6.
Director may take action concerning violations.

Whenever the director is satisfied that the farm of a Rhode Island producer or of an out-of-state producer is in violation of the terms and conditions of or the standards required under this chapter and chapter 2 of title 21, he or she may order that producer to discontinue the sale of and/or to discontinue offering for sale any milk produced by that producer until he or she is satisfied that the producer is in compliance with the terms and provisions of this chapter and chapter 2 of title 21.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3, P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-7.
Director empowered to require information.

The director has power reasonably to require from any producer holding a permit any information concerning that producer and/or his or her herds and animals as he or she may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-8.
No person to sell milk in violation of this chapter or chapter 2 of title 21.

No person shall produce for sale, sell or offer for sale, possess for sale, or distribute any milk produced in violation of this chapter or chapter 2 of title 21.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-9.
Director empowered to hire assistants.

The director shall employ any agents as required in enforcing the provisions of this chapter and may prescribe their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-10.
Penalties for violations.

Any person violating this chapter, shall for the first offense be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100), and for any subsequent offense not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than three (3) months or be punished by both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. Upon every conviction of an offender under this chapter, whether final or not, the director may take any action with respect to the milk or permit of the person committing the violation as he or she might by law take if that person had violated any of the provisions of chapter 2 of title 21.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-11.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it deems necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of these sums or so much as may from time to time be required upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.

4-6.1-12.
Director of health to enforce this chapter and chapter 2 of title 21 — Rules and regulations.

The director of health shall enforce this chapter and chapter 2 of title 21 and shall make any reasonable rules and regulations that he or she may deem necessary which are not inconsistent with the provisions of those chapters for the purpose of effectuating those provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 4.